Ohio, session 136, HB497.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5534.855 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 5534.855. In addition to any other name prescribed i n 7
the Revised Code or otherwise, the northbound and southbound 8
lanes of state route forty-nine, between Rossburg-Lightsville 9
road and McFeeley-Petry road, in Darke county, shall be known as 10
the "PFC James Vincent PottKotter Memorial Highway." 11
The director of transportation may erect suitable markers 12
along the highway indicating its name. 13